District of Columbia statutes.
22-1836

Benefitting financially from human trafficking.

It is unlawful for an individual or business knowingly to benefit, financially or by receiving anything of value, from voluntarily participating in a venture which has engaged in any act in violation of § 22-1832, § 22-1833, § 22-1834, or § 22-1835, knowing or in reckless disregard of the fact that the venture has engaged in the violation.

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 106, 57 DCR 5405
This section is referenced in § 14-311, § 22-1837, § 22-1839, and § 22-1840.